District of Columbia statutes.
29A-1124

Repealed

Transfer, assignment, or sale of franchise.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-185, § 5, 35 DCR 7906
April 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1002, 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 29-1204.
2001 Ed., § 29-1124.